District of Columbia statutes.
15-709

Fees and costs in Superior Court.

(a)

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia may prescribe fees and costs, including the fee to be paid for a jury trial.

(b)

Fees for services by the United States marshals for processes issued by the Superior Court shall be prescribed by rules of that court.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 535, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 554, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(12)(A)
June 19, 1986, 100 Stat. 633, Pub. L. 99-336, § 4(b)(6)

History

This section is referenced in § 15-713 and § 16-703.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 15-709.
1973 Ed., § 15-709.

Prior Codifications